Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.230

Individual-level outreach—Additional aid—Washington college grant program.

The office shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to:

(1) Facilitate individual-level outreach to individuals receiving benefits under the public assistance programs listed under RCW 28B.92.200(5), temporary assistance for needy families under chapter 74.08 RCW, the state family assistance program provided for in rule, and the basic food program to inform these individuals of their eligibility for the Washington college grant program; and

(2) Notify individuals whose financial need for purposes of Washington college grant eligibility has been demonstrated under RCW 28B.92.200(5)(a)(iv) that they may establish eligibility for additional state and federal aid by submitting a free application for federal student aid or a Washington application for state financial aid.

[ 2024 c 116 s 3; 2022 c 214 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 214: See note following RCW 28B.77.300.